Utah statutes.
64-13a-11.   Financial statements.

The financial statements of the Utah Correctional Industries Division shall be made up quarterly to the last day of September, December, March, and June in each year, and at other times as determined by the governor, and in every case Utah correctional industries shall prepare a balance sheet, income statement, and statement of changes in financial position.

